Hawaii statutes.
§338-5 Compulsory registration of births.
Within the time prescribed by the department of health, a certificate of every
birth shall be substantially completed and filed with the local agent of the
department in the district in which the birth occurred, by the administrator or
designated representative of the birthing facility, or physician, or midwife,
or other legally authorized person in attendance at the birth; or if not so
attended, by one of the parents.

The birth facility shall make available to the
department appropriate medical records for the purpose of monitoring compliance
with the provisions of this chapter. [L 1949, c 327, §9; RL 1955, §57-8; am L
Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS §338-5; am L 1988, c 149, §1]

Case Notes

Compulsory reporting not objectionable. 466 F. Supp. 714.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next